District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1131.01

Contribution limitations.

Repealed.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-204, § 3, 40 DCR 1
June 13, 1996, D.C. Law 11-144, § 3(a), 43 DCR 2174
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 5, 48 DCR 1873
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(e), 59 DCR 1862
1981 Ed., § 1-1441.1.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Board of Education Campaign Contribution Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-217, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3459).

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Board of Education Campaign Contribution Clarification Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-249, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2762).

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Board of Education Campaign Contribution Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-102, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3622).

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Board of Education Campaign Contribution Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-416, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7304).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Board of Education Campaign Contribution Clarification Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-483, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 15).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Board of Education Campaign Contribution Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-502, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10033).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Board of Education Campaign Contribution Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-237, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10908).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(e) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Addition by Initiative 41: D.C. Law 9-204 was enacted by the electors of the District of Columbia in Initiative Measure 41.

Applicability of chapter to Law 11-144: Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-144, the Contribution Limitation Initiative Amendment Act of 1996, provided that D.C. Code § 1-1101.01 et seq. shall apply to the act. D.C. Law 11-144 repeals § 1-1104.01 and amends §§ 1-1131.01, 1-1131.03, and 1-1104.02.